Tennessee, session 114, SB2205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-2-202(b), is amended by adding
the following appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) The estimated total project cost;
( ) The current phase of project development;
( ) The anticipated procurement or delivery method;
( ) The anticipated completion date;
( ) A general description or map identifying the location of the project within
existing or proposed transportation corridors;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2205
012436
- 1 -